Illinois, session 104th, HB1208.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 110-6 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/110-6)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-6)7    Sec. 110-6. Revocation of pretrial release, modification 8of conditions of pretrial release, and sanctions for 9violations of conditions of pretrial release. 10    (a) When a defendant has previously been granted pretrial 11release under this Article for any offense Section for a 12felony or Class A misdemeanor, that pretrial release shall may 13be revoked only if the defendant is charged with an offense 14that is alleged to have occurred during the defendant's 15pretrial release, regardless of the classification of offense, 16is charged with a felony or Class A misdemeanor that is alleged 17to have occurred during the defendant's pretrial release after 18a hearing on the court's own motion or upon the filing of a 19verified petition by the State.20    When a defendant released pretrial is charged with a 21violation of a protective order or was previously convicted of 22a violation of a protective order and the subject of the 23protective order is the same person as the victim in the   HB1208- 2 -LRB104 03627 RLC 13651 b1current underlying matter, the State shall file a verified 2petition seeking revocation of pretrial release. 3    Upon the filing of a petition or upon motion of the court 4seeking revocation, the court shall order the transfer of the 5defendant and the petition or motion to the court before which 6the previous felony or Class A misdemeanor is pending. The 7defendant may be held in custody pending transfer to and a 8hearing before such court. The defendant shall be transferred 9to the court before which the previous matter is pending 10without unnecessary delay, and the revocation hearing shall 11occur within 72 hours of the filing of the State's petition or 12the court's motion for revocation. 13    A hearing at which pretrial release may be revoked must be 14conducted in person (and not by way of two-way audio-visual 15communication) unless the accused waives the right to be 16present physically in court, the court determines that the 17physical health and safety of any person necessary to the 18proceedings would be endangered by appearing in court, or the 19chief judge of the circuit orders use of that system due to 20operational challenges in conducting the hearing in person. 21Such operational challenges must be documented and approved by 22the chief judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the 23challenges through reasonable efforts must be presented and 24approved by the Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts 25every 6 months. 26    The court before which the previous felony matter or Class   HB1208- 3 -LRB104 03627 RLC 13651 b1A misdemeanor is pending may revoke the defendant's pretrial 2release after a hearing. During the hearing for revocation, 3the defendant shall be represented by counsel and have an 4opportunity to be heard regarding the violation and evidence 5in mitigation. The court shall consider all relevant 6circumstances, including, but not limited to, the nature and 7seriousness of the violation or criminal act alleged. The 8State shall bear the burden of proving, by clear and 9convincing evidence, that no condition or combination of 10conditions of release would reasonably ensure the appearance 11of the defendant for later hearings or prevent the defendant 12from being charged with a subsequent felony or Class A 13misdemeanor. 14    In lieu of revocation, the court may release the defendant 15pre-trial, with or without modification of conditions of 16pretrial release.17    If the case that caused the revocation is dismissed, the 18defendant is found not guilty in the case causing the 19revocation, or the defendant completes a lawfully imposed 20sentence on the case causing the revocation, the court shall, 21without unnecessary delay, hold a hearing on conditions of 22pretrial release pursuant to Section 110-5 and release the 23defendant with or without modification of conditions of 24pretrial release.25    Both the State and the defendant may appeal an order 26revoking pretrial release or denying a petition for revocation   HB1208- 4 -LRB104 03627 RLC 13651 b1of release.2    (b) If a defendant previously has been granted pretrial 3release under this Section for a Class B or Class C misdemeanor 4offense, a petty or business offense, or an ordinance 5violation and if the defendant is subsequently charged with a 6felony that is alleged to have occurred during the defendant's 7pretrial release or a Class A misdemeanor offense that is 8alleged to have occurred during the defendant's pretrial 9release, such pretrial release may not be revoked, but the 10court may impose sanctions under subsection (c). 11    (c) The court shall follow the procedures set forth in 12Section 110-3 to ensure the defendant's appearance in court if 13the defendant:14        (1) fails to appear in court as required by the 15    defendant's conditions of release;16        (2) is charged with a felony or Class A misdemeanor 17    offense that is alleged to have occurred during the 18    defendant's pretrial release after having been previously 19    granted pretrial release for a Class B or Class C 20    misdemeanor, a petty or business offense, or an ordinance 21    violation that is alleged to have occurred during the 22    defendant's pretrial release;23        (3) is charged with a Class B or C misdemeanor 24    offense, petty or business offense, or ordinance violation 25    that is alleged to have occurred during the defendant's 26    pretrial release; or   HB1208- 5 -LRB104 03627 RLC 13651 b1        (4) violates any other condition of pretrial release 2    set by the court. 3    In response to a violation described in this subsection, 4the court may issue a warrant specifying that the defendant 5must appear before the court for a hearing for sanctions and 6may not be released by law enforcement before that appearance. 7    (d) When a defendant appears in court pursuant to a 8summons or warrant issued in accordance with Section 110-3 or 9after being arrested for an offense that is alleged to have 10occurred during the defendant's pretrial release, the State 11may file a verified petition requesting a hearing for 12sanctions.13    (e) During the hearing for sanctions, the defendant shall 14be represented by counsel and have an opportunity to be heard 15regarding the violation and evidence in mitigation. The State 16shall bear the burden of proving by clear and convincing 17evidence that:18        (1) the defendant committed an act that violated a 19    term of the defendant's pretrial release;20        (2) the defendant had actual knowledge that the 21    defendant's action would violate a court order;22        (3) the violation of the court order was willful; and23        (4) the violation was not caused by a lack of access to 24    financial monetary resources.25    (f) Sanctions for violations of pretrial release may 26include:  HB1208- 6 -LRB104 03627 RLC 13651 b1        (1) a verbal or written admonishment from the court;2        (2) imprisonment in the county jail for a period not 3    exceeding 30 days;4        (3) (Blank); or5        (4) a modification of the defendant's pretrial 6    conditions.7    (g) The court may, at any time, after motion by either 8party or on its own motion, remove previously set conditions 9of pretrial release, subject to the provisions in this 10subsection. The court may only add or increase conditions of 11pretrial release at a hearing under this Section.12    The court shall not remove a previously set condition of 13pretrial release regulating contact with a victim or witness 14in the case, unless the subject of the condition has been given 15notice of the hearing as required in paragraph (1) of 16subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime Victims 17and Witnesses Act. If the subject of the condition of release 18is not present, the court shall follow the procedures of 19paragraph (10) of subsection (c-1) of the Rights of Crime 20Victims and Witnesses Act.21    (h) Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's 22Attorney's office of all hearings under this Section as 23required in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of 24the Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act and shall be 25informed of their opportunity at these hearings to obtain a 26protective order.  HB1208- 7 -LRB104 03627 RLC 13651 b1    (i) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit 2the State's ability to file a verified petition seeking denial 3of pretrial release under subsection (a) of Section 110-6.1 or 4subdivision (d)(2) of Section 110-6.1.5    (j) At each subsequent appearance of the defendant before 6the court, the judge must find that continued detention under 7this Section is necessary to reasonably ensure the appearance 8of the defendant for later hearings or to prevent the 9defendant from being charged with a subsequent felony or Class 10A misdemeanor. 11(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1104, eff. 1-1-23.)